Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-691.02
Transfer off overlying land for domestic use; applicability of section.

Section 46-691.01 applies to all such transfers and uses of ground water before, on, and after September 1, 2001.

Laws 2001, LB 472, § 2.